Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.420

Receivership—Defenses to petition.

It shall be a defense to the petition to establish a receivership that the conditions alleged do not in fact exist. It shall not be a defense to the petition to allege that the respondent did not possess knowledge of the alleged condition or could not have been reasonably expected to know about the alleged condition. In a petition that alleges that the health, safety, or welfare of the residents of the facility is at issue, it shall not be a defense to the petition that the respondent had not been afforded a reasonable opportunity to correct the alleged condition.

[ 1987 c 476 s 11.]